Utah statutes.
78B-1-206.   List of qualified interpreters -- Use -- Appointment of another.

(1)  The Utah division of rehabilitation services shall establish, maintain, update, and distribute a list of qualified interpreters.

(2)  When an interpreter is required under this part, the appointing authority shall use one of the interpreters on the list provided by the Utah division of rehabilitation services.  If none of the listed interpreters are available or are able to provide effective interpreting with the particular hearing-impaired person, then the appointing authority shall appoint another qualified interpreter who is able to accurately and simultaneously communicate with and translate information to and from the particular hearing-impaired person involved.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

